Utah statutes.
69-1-2.   Transmitting written instruments by telegraph or telephone authorized -- Entitled to record -- Force and effect of copies -- Documents submitted to recorder -- Requirements.

Any power of attorney or other instrument in writing duly proved or acknowledged and certified so as to be entitled to record may, together with the certificate of its proof or acknowledgment, be sent by telegraph or telephone, and the telegraphic or telephonic copy shall prima facie have the same force and effect in all respects, and may be admitted to record and recorded in the same manner and with the same effect, as the original.  Documents submitted to the county recorder for recording shall be original or certified copies from other offices of public record, as required by Title 57.



Amended by Chapter 93, 1990 General Session

